src/fst/phonology.twolc
"ә:и in extra short to и"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 ә:и <=> # (2InitSylls) Cns* и %> к:х _ [ д | н | т | ˮ ]  ;


!2014-10-23!"°:ы in extra short to ы"
!2014-10-23! __@RULENAME@__
!2014-10-23! °:ы <=> # (2InitSylls) Cns* ы %> к:х _  [ д | н | т | ʼ | ˮ | ю ]  ;
!2014-10-23!

"ә:ы in extra short to ы"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 ә:ы <=> # (2InitSylls) Cns* ы %> к:х _ [ д | н | т | ˮ ]  ;


!2014-10-23!"°:э in extra short to э"
!2014-10-23! __@RULENAME@__
!2014-10-23! °:э <=> # (2InitSylls) Cns* [ :э | е ] %> к:х _  [ д | н | т | ʼ | ˮ | ю ]  ;
!2014-10-23!!€# не%>к°т°та
!2014-10-23!!€# не0хэтата
!2014-10-23!!€# не%>к°д°ниʼ
!2014-10-23!!€0 не0хэданиʼ

"ә:э in extra short to э"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 ә:э <=> # (2InitSylls) Cns* [ :э | е ] %> к:х _ [ д | н | т | ˮ ]  ;

"ә:а in extra short to а"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 ә:а <=>  [ м: | н: | %{рл%}: | в | т | д | к:г ] _   ;
           # (2InitSylls) Cns* [ а | я ] %> к:х _ [ д | н | т | ˮ ]  ;
        # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns [ °: %{йнңъʼØ%}: | °: С1: ] %>  [ к:г | к ] (°: д ) _  ;
!!€# ил°%{йнңъʼØ%}%>кәд
!!€0 ил0ң0гад


"0:а in Pros"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 0:а <=> # Cns* [ а | я ] %> ˮ _ Cns [ # | %> ]  ;
!!€# ма%>ˮ0н
!!€0 ма0ˮан

! # (2InitSylls) Cns* [ а | я ] [(%{дˮØ%}:|С1:) %> ˮ | [ %{дˮØ%}: | С1: ] %> ] _ [ м °: | н °: # | %{рл%}: °: ]  ;
!!€# ма%>ˮ0м°н%{ая%}
!!€0 ма0ˮам0на
!     # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns °: С1: %> _ [ %{рл%}: °: | м °: # ] ;
!!€# ман°С1%>0%{рл%}°
!!€0 манаˮ0ал0
!!€# ман°С1%>0м°
!!€0 манаˮ0ам0
!
!"0:а in Pros RIGHT"
! __@RULENAME@__
! 0:а => # (2InitSylls) Cns* [ а | я ] [(%{дˮØ%}:|С1:) %> ˮ | [ %{дˮØ%}: | С1: ] %> ] _ [ м °: | н °: # | %{рл%}: °: ]  ;
!!!€# ма%>ˮ0м°н%{ая%}
!!!€0 ма0ˮам0на
!     # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns °: С1: %> _ [ %{рл%}: °: | м °: # ] ;
!     # (2InitSylls) Cns* Vow Cns °: С1: %> _ %{рл%}: °:  ;
!!€# ман°С1%>0%{рл%}°
!!€0 манаˮ0ал0
!!€# ман°С1%>0м°
!!€0 манаˮ0ам0
!
! RIGHT ARROW ONLY
!       # Cns* Vow Cns _ %> м °: ;
!!€# хан%>м°
!!€0 хан0в0

"0:э in Pros"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 0:э <=> # Cns* [ :э | е ] %> ˮ _ Cns  [ # | %> ]   ;
! # (2InitSylls) Cns* [ :э | е ] %> ˮ _ Cns °:  ;
!!€# ңэ%>ˮ0м°н%{ая%}
!!€0 ңэ0ˮэм0на

"0:о between two glottals"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 0:о <=>
! С1: %> _ ˮ м а ;
  #  Cns* [ о | :ё %^A2O: ] %> ˮ _ Cns  [ # | %> ]   ;
!        # (2InitSylls) Cns* [ о | :ё %^A2O: ] %> ˮ _ Cns °:  ;
!!€# хо%>ˮ0м°н%{ая%}
!!€0 хо0ˮом0на
!!€# я%^A2O%>ˮ0м°н%{ая%}
!!€0 ё00ˮом0на

"0:и after glottal"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 0:и <=> # Cns* [ :и (%^A2I:)] %> ˮ _ Cns  [ # | %> ]   ;
! # (2InitSylls) Cns* [ :и (%^A2I:)] %> ˮ _ Cns °:  ;
!!€# си%>ˮ0м°н%{ая%}
!!€0 си0ˮим0на

"0:ы between two glottals"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 0:ы <=>
! С1: %> _ ˮ м а ;
 # Cns* [ ы ] %> ˮ _ Cns  [ # | %> ]   ;
!# (2InitSylls) Cns* [ ы ] %> ˮ _ Cns °:  ;
!!€# ңы%>ˮ0м°н%{ая%}
!!€0 ңы0ˮым0на

"0:у between two glottals"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 0:у <=>
! С1: %> _ ˮ м а ;
      # Cns* [ у | ю ] %> ˮ _ Cns  [ # | %> ]   ;
!      # (2InitSylls) Cns* [ у | ю ] %> ˮ _ Cns °:  ;
!!€# ңу%>ˮ0м°н%{ая%}
!!€0 ңу0ˮум0на


!2014-03-24 !"%{ая%}:а in Pros"
!2014-03-24 !¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24 ! %{ая%}:а <=> # Cns* [ э ] %> ˮ _ м °: н %{ая%}: ;
!2014-03-24 ¶¶€# ңэ%>ˮ0м°н%{ая%}
!2014-03-24 ¶¶€0 ңэ0ˮэм0на
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 "0:а between %{дˮØ%}: %> and  мна"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  0:а <=> %{дˮØ%}: %> _ м н а ;

 "й:0 when followed by vowel in VowelPalatalization"
!! **@RULENAME@**
  й:0 <=> _ %> [ а: | у: | е ] ;


"а:я VowelPalatalization left"
!! **@RULENAME@**
а:я <=> [ й:0 | ь:0 ] %> _ ;
       [ ь:] _ %{йнңъʼØ%}: ;

!2014-03-24 "а:я VowelPalatalization right"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  а:я => [ й:0 | ь:0 ] %> _ ;
!2014-03-24         е %> н _ [ к [ ы | э: ] | р (а) х | # ] ;

"%{ая%}:я VowelPalatalization left"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{ая%}:я <= %> с _ %^VowRaise:0 %> ;

"%{ая%}:я VowelPalatalization right"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{ая%}:я =>  %> с _ %^VowRaise:0 %> ;
  # [[ с | н | т ] [ е | и | ю ] | и ] [( [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ) %> (ˮ)| %> ˮ ] [ ( 0: ) м: | к: ] °: (ˮ) н _ ;
  # [[ с | н | т ] [ е | и | ю ] | и ] [( [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ) (%^PLNOM:) %> ] [ т | (н|м) д ] _ ;
!# [[ с | н | т ] [ е | и | ю ] | и ] [( [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ) %> (ˮ)| %> ˮ ] %{ауоэиыØ%}: %{увм%}: (А2:) н _ ;
   # п э в а: ʼ: %> н: _ ;
   Cns %^PalVariation: ( [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ) (%^PLNOM:) %> [ т | (н:|м:) д: | (ˮ) [ ( 0: ) м: | к: ] °: (ˮ) н ] _ ;
!!€# тар%^PalVariation%{дˮØ%}%>к°н%{ая%}
!!€0 тар000кана
!!€0 тар000кна
!!€0 тар000каня
!!€0 тар000кня
!!€# тар%^PalVariation%{дˮØ%}%>д%{ая%}
!!€0 тар000та
!!€0 тар000тя


"%{оё%}:ё VowelPalatalization right"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{оё%}:ё =>
  # [[ с | н | т ] [ е | и | ю ] | и ] [( [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ) (%^PLNOM:) %> ] [ т | (н|м) д ] _ ;
!!€# ню%>д%{оё%}ʼ
!!€0 ню0доʼ
!!€0 ню0дёʼ
  Cns %^PalVariation: ( [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ) (%^PLNOM:) %> [ т | (н:|м:) д: ] _ ;
!!€# тар%^PalVariation%{дˮØ%}%>д%{оё%}ʼ
!!€0 тар000тоʼ
!!€0 тар000тёʼ

!2014-03-24 "у:ю VowelPalatalization"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  у:ю <=> [ й: | ь: ]  %> _ ;
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 "А2:0 possible vowel loss as second syllable vowel"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  А2:0 <= # Cns* :Vow [ %> | Cns | ˮ ]+ %{увм%}: _ н а ; 
!2014-03-24          :Vow %^MLenition:0 %> %{увм%}: _ н а ; 
!2014-03-24          # Cns:* Vow:+ %{йнңъʼØ%}: (%^MLenition:0) %> %{увм%}: _ н а ; ¶¶ поʼ:помна
!2014-03-24          [ д | м: (ʼ: ) | н | р ] %^MLenition:0 %> 0: %{увм%}: _ н а ; 
!2014-03-24          # Cns* :Vow [( [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] )| Cns+ ( :0* у: ) | й: у: | Cns Vow ] %> %{ауоэиыØ%}: %{увм%}: _ н %{ая%}: ;
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 "0:U in sgprossuf"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  0:у <=> [ д | м: (ʼ: ) | н | р ] %> _ %{увм%}: А2: н а ;
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 "%{ауоэØ%} -> 0 right"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ {{{
!2014-03-24  %{ауоэØ%}:0 =>       # Cns* [ а | я | и | ы | у | ю ] [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> к: _ [ ʼ | н а | д а | т Vow | ˮ: н Vow ] ; 
!2014-03-24  # Cns* [ о | э | е ] [ %{нңʼØ%}: | %{йнңъʼØ%}: ] %> к: _ [ ( ˮ ) н а | т Vow ] ;
!2014-03-24  # Cns* Vow [ %{нңʼØ%}: | %{йнңъʼØ%}: ] %> д _ р е ; ¶¶= @CODE@ odd-syllables
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ }}}
!2014-03-24 "%{ауоэØ%} <- 0 left"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  %{ауоэØ%}:0 <=  # Cns* [ а | я | и | ы | у | ю ] [ %{нңʼØ%}: | %{йнңъʼØ%}: ] %> к: _ ʼ ; 
!2014-03-24 !      # Cns* [ а | я | и | ы | у | ю ] [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> к: _ ʼ ; 
!2014-03-24 ! # Cns* [ о | э | е ] [ %{нңʼØ%}: | %{йнңъʼØ%}: ] %> к: _ ( ˮ ) н а ;
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 "%{ауоэØ%} <- а left"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  %{ауоэØ%}:а <= [ Cns* [ а | я | о | у | ю | ы | и ] [ %{нңʼØ%}: | %{йнңъʼØ%}: ]| %> с %{ая%}: ] %> к: _ [ Cns  | ˮ ] ;
!2014-03-24 !  # Cns* [ а | я | у | ю | ы | и ] [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> к: _ [ Cns  | ˮ ] ;
!2014-03-24     [ %> | а ] я %> к: _ ʼ ;
!2014-03-24                    [[ [ Cns | # Cns* ] [ :а | :я | й | и | ы | Ы2:ы ] | Cns ] %> к: | %> а х ] _ ;
!2014-03-24 !                   [[ а | я | й | и | ы | Ы2:ы | Cns ] %> к: | %> а х ] _ ;
!2014-03-24        # Cns* [ о | э | е ] [ %{нңʼØ%}: | %{йнңъʼØ%}: ] %> к: _ [ ʼ | д ] ; 
!2014-03-24       # Cns* Vow: Cns+ Vow: (%^VowFronting:0) %> й %> к: _ [ Cns  | ˮ ] ;
!2014-03-24 !!€# хона%>й%>х%{ауоэØ%}нзь
!2014-03-24 !!€0 хонэ0й0ханзь
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 "%{ауоэØ%} -> а right"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  %{ауоэØ%}:а =>   [Cns* [ а | я | о | у | ю | ы | и ] [ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ]| %> с %{ая%}: | %> я | а я ] %> к: _ ;
!2014-03-24                    [[ [ Cns | # Cns* ] [ а | я | й | и | ы | Ы2: ]| Cns ] %> к: | %> а х ] _ ;
!2014-03-24 !                   [[ а | я | й | и | ы | Ы2: | Cns ] %> к: | %> а х ] _ ;
!2014-03-24        # Cns* [ о | э | е ] [ %{нңʼØ%}: | %{йнңъʼØ%}: ] %> к: _ [ ʼ | д ] ; 
!2014-03-24        # Cns* [ о | э | е ] [ %{нңʼØ%}: | %{йнңъʼØ%}: ] %> к: _ [( ˮ ) н Vow | т Vow ] ; 
!2014-03-24       # Cns* Vow: Cns+ Vow: (%^VowFronting:0) %> й %> к: _ [ Cns  | ˮ ] ;
!2014-03-24 !!€# хона%>й%>х%{ауоэØ%}нзь
!2014-03-24 !!€0 хонэ0й0ханзь
!2014-03-24 ¶¶# Cns* Vow+ Cns* Vow: [[ %{йнңъʼØ%}: | %{нңʼØ%}: |  ʼ: | %{дˮØ%}: | С1: ] %> к: | %> а х ] _ ;
!2014-03-24 !2013-03-15! adding и | ы | й | Ы2: for тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcDu3
!2014-03-24  # Cns* PAIRSYLL+ %> д _ р е ; ¶¶= @CODE@ even-syllables
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 "%{аяуюØ%}:а vowel singular accusative after consonant LEFT"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  %{аяуюØ%}:а <= Cns %> _ [ :Cns - :в ] ;
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 "%{аяуюØ%}:а vowel singular accusative after consonant RIGHT"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  %{аяуюØ%}:а => Cns %> _ :Cns ;
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 "%{аяуюØ%}:у vowel singular accusative after consonant RIGHT"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  %{аяуюØ%}:у => Cns %> _ :в ;
!2014-03-24 

"%{ауоэØ%} <-> у"
!! The rule **@RULENAME@**:
 %{ауоэØ%}:у <=> [ :у | :ю ]  %> [ к: | х ]        _   ; 
                                 [ к: | х ]  :у  х _ ю ; 
!!€# ну%>к%{ауоэØ%}рт
!!€0 ну0хурт

"%{ауоэØ%} -> о"
!! The rule **@RULENAME@**:
%{ауоэØ%}:о <=> [ :о | :ё ] (%^VowLower:0|%^A2O:0) %> [ к: | ˮ | х ]       _   ;
                                      [ к:     | х ] :о  х _ ю ; 

"%{ауоэØ%} -> а"
!! The rule **@RULENAME@**:
%{ауоэØ%}:а <=> [ :а | :я ] (%{дˮØ%}:) (%^VowLower:0) %> [ к: | ˮ | х ]   _   ;
              [ :а | :я ] %{дˮØ%}: (%^VowLower:0) %>  _   ;
 [ а: | я: ] %^VowLoss:0 %> [ к: | ˮ | х ]   _   ;
!!€# намда%^VowLoss%>к%{ауоэØ%}в
!!€0 намд000хав
                              [ к:     | х ] :а  х _ ю ; 
!!€# мя%{дˮØ%}%>%{ауоэØ%}л
!!€0 мяˮ0ал
             Vow  [ :Cns | й] ([°:0|°:а] (С1:)|%{йнңъʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|ң) %> [к:|ˮ] _ ;
!!€# му%{нңʼØ%}%>к%{ауоэØ%}на 
!!€0 муң0гана
!!€# ед°%>к%{ауоэØ%}на
!!€# ед00хана

 "%{ауоэØ%} -> э"
!! **@RULENAME@**
  %{ауоэØ%}:э <=> [ Ы2:э | ы:э | э | :е ] (%^VowLower:0) %> [ к: | х | ˮ ] _ ;
!2014-03-24 !2013-03-15¶¶[ ы | э | е ]  %> к: _ ;
        [ к: | х ]  :э  х _ ю ;   

 "%{ауоэØ%} <-> ы"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{ауоэØ%}:ы <=> [ ы| а:ы  %^A2I: ] %> [ к: | х | ˮ ] _ ;
!!€# хо%>сеты%>к%{ауоэØ%}ʼ
!!€0 хо0сеты0хыʼ
              [ ъ | ˮ %> ъ:0 ] и %> [ к: | х ] _ ;

 "%{ауоэØ%} <-> и"
!! **@RULENAME@**
  %{ауоэØ%}:и <=> [[Vow: | Cns | :ʼ ] %> ъ:0 и | я: %^A2I: | а:и %^A2I: ] %> [ к: | х | ˮ ] _ ;
        [ к: | х ]  :и  х _ ю ;   
!!€# пя%^A2I%>ˮ%{ауоэØ%}н
!!€0 пи00ˮин


!2014-03-24 "%{ауоэиыØ%} <-> а"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  %{ауоэиыØ%}:а <=> # Cns* [ :а | :я ]  [[ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> (ˮ)| %> ˮ ] _ %{увм%}: (А2:) н %{ая%}: ;
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 "%{ауоэиыØ%} <-> ы"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  %{ауоэиыØ%}:ы <=> # Cns* [ ы ]  [[ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> (ˮ)| %> ˮ ] _ %{увм%}: (А2:) н %{ая%}: ;
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 "%{ауоэиыØ%} <-> и"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  %{ауоэиыØ%}:и <=>  # Cns* [ и ]  [[ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> (ˮ)| %> ˮ ] _ %{увм%}: (А2:) н %{ая%}: ;
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 "%{ауоэиыØ%} <-> о"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  %{ауоэиыØ%}:о <=>  # Cns* [ :о | :ё ]  [[ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> (ˮ)| %> ˮ ] _ %{увм%}: (А2:) н %{ая%}: ;
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 "%{ауоэиыØ%} <-> у"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  %{ауоэиыØ%}:у <=>  # Cns* [ :ю | :у ]  [[ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> (ˮ)| %> ˮ ] _ %{увм%}: (А2:) н %{ая%}: ;
!2014-03-24 
!2014-03-24 "%{ауоэиыØ%} <-> э"
!2014-03-24 ¶¶ __@RULENAME@__
!2014-03-24  %{ауоэиыØ%}:э <=>  # Cns* [ :е | э ]  [[ [%{нңʼØ%}:|%{дˮØ%}:|С1:] ] %> (ˮ)| %> ˮ ] _ %{увм%}: (А2:) н %{ая%}: ;


!! ## VOWEL LOWERING

"i2e StemFinalYToE LEFT"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 ы:э <=>  _ %^VowLower: ;
![ %> [ к: °: | к: ә: | с и ˮ | ˮ 0: м: | р | д °: Cns | д | н | м: [ °: | и | а | ә: | д ]  | н [ °: ʼ | и | д ] | %{рл%}: | в [ °: | а | ә: ] | ң э ] ]  ;
!          _ %^SCSG2: %> н [ а | °: ] ;
! _ [ %^VowLower:0 %> (ˮ) (%{ауоэиыØ%}:| :э) :CnsNotGlots | (%^VowLower:0) %> [ к: | ң ] э ]  ;
